Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.18B of Title 59, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Pharmacy technician applicants who are seventeen (17) years of
age or older and enrolled in a youth apprenticeship program for
pharmacy technicians or a pharmacy technician training program
through the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education
shall complete Phase II pharmacy technician training in a pharmacy
HB1585 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

with out the requirement to be a pharmacy employee. All pharmacy
technician training programs shall be approved by the Oklahoma State
Board of Pharmacy initially and on an annual basis. This permit
will only be used for educational purposes for those enrolled in an
Oklahoma State Board of Pharmacy approved program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/06/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.
















HB1585 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.